Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
POWERED MICROMOBILITY DEVICES AND MOTOR ASSISTED SCOOTERS
SECTION 1. Sections 2, 3 and  4 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 2. Definition of “powered micromobility  device.”  (1) “Powered micromobility
device” means a vehicle that:
(a) Is designed to transport a person;
(b) Has a propulsion system;
(c) Has a maximum speed of 28 miles per hour; and
(d) Has an unloaded weight of less than 100 pounds.
(2) “Powered micromobility device” does not include:
(a) Devices exclusively powered by human power; or
(b) The following devices or vehicles:
(A) Electric assisted bicycles;
(B) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(C) Motor assisted scooters;
(D) Motorized wheelchairs;
(E) Motorcycles;
(F) Mopeds; or
(G) All-terrain vehicles.
SECTION 3.
Application of vehicle laws to powered micromobility devices. (1) A powered
micromobility device is not a motor vehicle for purposes of the Oregon Vehicle  Code, except
when specifically provided by statute.
(2) A person operating a powered  micromobility device is subject to any provisions ap-
plicable to and has the same rights and duties as the driver of  a bicycle, except when oth-
erwise specifically provided by statute.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 1
(3) Subject to  the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, for purposes of the
vehicle code:
(a) A powered micromobility device is a vehicle; and
(b) When the term “vehicle” is used  the term shall be deemed to be applicable to powered
micromobility devices, except those provisions  that by their very nature can have no appli-
cation to the devices.
(4) The provisions of the vehicle code relating  to the operation of a powered micromo-
bility device do not relieve an operator or motorist from the duty to exercise due care.
SECTION 4.
Local government and state agency regulation  of the operation of powered
micromobility devices. Local governments, as defined in ORS 174.116, and state agencies
having jurisdiction over bicycle lanes, bicycle paths, sidewalks and trails of public passage
may:
(1) Prohibit the operation  of powered micromobility devices on bicycle lanes, bicycle
paths, sidewalks and trails; or
(2) Regulate, by ordinance or rule and  by traffic control device, the operation of powered
micromobility devices on bicycle lanes, bicycle paths, sidewalks  and trails and the time, place
and manner of the operation of powered micromobility devices on bicycle  lanes, bicycle
paths, sidewalks and trails.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 803.030 is amended to read:
803.030. This section establishes exemptions  from the requirements under ORS 803.025 to obtain
title issued by this state. The  exemptions are subject to ORS 803.040. The exemptions are in addition
to any  exemptions under ORS 801.026. Vehicles exempted by this section from the requirements to
be titled by this state are not prohibited from being titled by this state if titling is permitted  under
ORS 803.035. The exemptions are partial or complete as provided in the following:
(1) Title from this state is not required for a  vehicle unless the vehicle is operated on a highway
in this state.
(2) Title from this state is not required unless a vehicle is operated under a registration  number
of this state.
(3) Snowmobiles and Class I, Class III and Class IV all-terrain vehicles  are not subject to the
requirements under ORS 803.025. The requirements and procedures for  titling snowmobiles are as
provided under ORS 821.060 and 821.070.
(4) Road rollers, farm tractors and traction engines are exempt from the requirements for title.
(5) Trolleys are exempt from the requirements for title.
(6) Bicycles are exempt from the requirements for title.
(7) United States Government  owned and operated motor vehicles and trailers are exempt from
the requirements for title.
(8) Implements of husbandry,  well drilling machinery, emergency fire apparatus providing public
fire protection and wheelchairs are exempt from the requirements for title.
(9) Except  as provided in subsection (23) of this section, fixed load vehicles are exempt from the
requirements for title while operated within the immediate construction  project, as described in the
governmental agency contract,  in the construction or reconstruction of state or county roads,
highways or city streets.
(10) Motor vehicles designed to  operate at a loaded weight over 8,000 pounds, trailers and
equipment are exempt from requirements for title while:
(a) Owned, leased, contracted or requisitioned by the State Forester, State Board of Forestry,
their contractors under ORS chapter 477, or the federal government; and
(b) Being used for the purposes  of forest protection and fire suppression under ORS chapter 477
or a similar federal statute, including movement of the vehicles to and from the work area.
(11) Farm trailers are  exempt from requirements for title when the operation or movement of
the vehicle upon the highways is incidental to its use in an agricultural operation.
(12) Golf carts operated under an ordinance adopted under ORS 810.070  are exempt from re-
quirements for title.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 2
(13) Golf carts or similar vehicles are exempt from requirements for title when:
(a) They have not less than three wheels in contact with the ground;
(b) They have an unloaded weight of less than 1,300 pounds;
(c) They are designed to be and are operated at not more than 15 miles per hour; and
(d) They are operated by persons with disabilities.
(14) The nonresident owners of vehicles currently registered and titled in any other country,
state or  territory may operate such vehicles over the highways of this state without complying with
the titling requirements under ORS 803.025. All of the following apply to this subsection:
(a) This subsection only provides an  exemption so long as the owner satisfactorily shows that
the owner is not a resident of this state or has been a resident of this state  for less than 30 days.
For the purpose of this paragraph, a person is a resident  of this state if the person meets the resi-
dency requirements described in ORS 803.200.
(b) The exemption under this subsection applies to  vehicles granted exemptions under ORS
802.500, 802.520 or 826.005, unless otherwise provided under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a vehicle operated over  the highways of this
state for compensation or profit must comply with the titling  requirements under ORS 803.025 in the
same manner as required of  nontitled vehicles. The following vehicles are not subject to this para-
graph:
(A) Vehicles operated under reciprocal registration exemptions established under ORS 802.500
or 826.005.
(B) Vehicles operated under an exemption established under ORS 802.520.
(C) Vehicles that are  proportionally registered under an agreement established under ORS
826.007, and according to the procedures established under ORS 826.009 or 826.011.
(D) Any vehicle if duly registered and titled under the laws of the state or country of which the
owner is a bona fide resident to the extent that in the foreign country, state, territory  or federal
district where the  owner resides like exemptions and privileges are granted vehicles duly registered
and titled under the laws of this state and owned by residents of this state.
(d) If no exemptions from titling requirements are in  effect under ORS 802.500, 802.520, 826.005
or 826.007 with respect to  another jurisdiction, any vehicle properly registered and titled in such
other jurisdiction and for which evidence of compliance is supplied  shall receive, when operated in
this state, the same exemptions,  benefits and privileges granted by such other jurisdictions to vehi-
cles properly registered and titled in this  state. Reciprocity extended under this paragraph shall
apply to commercial vehicles only when engaged exclusively in interstate commerce.
(e) Any vehicle operated  under dealer registration plates issued by another state, country,
province, territory or the District of Columbia is subject to this subsection.
(15) Vehicle dealers issued certificates under ORS 822.020 may use  and operate untitled vehicles
as provided under ORS 822.040.
(16) Towing businesses issued certificates under  ORS 822.205 may tow untitled vehicles as pro-
vided under ORS 822.210.
(17) Vehicle transporters issued certificates under ORS 822.310 may  transport untitled vehicles
as provided in ORS 822.310.
(18) Untitled vehicles may be operated under trip permits described under ORS 803.600  or under
permits described under ORS 803.610 to 803.625.
(19) Vehicles that are registered by the United States Department  of State and that are owned
or operated by  foreign nationals with diplomatic immunity are exempt from the requirements for
title.
(20)(a) Vehicles that are registered under the proportional registration provisions  of ORS chap-
ter 826 and are titled in a  jurisdiction other than Oregon are exempt from the requirements for title.
(b) A trailer that is registered  under the proportional registration provisions of ORS chapter 826
and titled in a jurisdiction other than  Oregon shall remain exempt from the requirements for title
in Oregon  if the trailer is registered when the other jurisdiction removes its exception to propor-
tional registration requirements for the trailer.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 3
(21) Converter dollies and tow dollies are exempt from the requirements for title.
(22) Electric personal assistive mobility devices are exempt from the requirements for title.
(23) Road machinery that is operated at  the direction of a road authority is exempt from the
requirements for title. The exemption under this subsection also applies  when the operation of road
machinery upon a highway or an alley is incidental to its use in a highway maintenance operation.
(24) Special mobile equipment is exempt from the requirements for title.
(25) Powered micromobility devices are exempt from the requirements for title.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 803.305 is amended to read:
803.305. This section establishes exemptions  from the requirements under ORS 803.300. The ex-
emptions under  this section are in addition to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. Vehicles exempted
by this section from the requirements to be registered by  this state are not prohibited from being
registered by this state if registration is permitted under ORS  803.310. The following are exempt,
either partially or completely as described, from the registration requirements under ORS 803.300:
(1) Road rollers, farm tractors, trolleys and traction engines are exempt from registration.
(2) Bicycles are exempt from registration.
(3) A vehicle is exempt from registration if it has registration issued for the vehicle by  the
Armed Forces of the United States where the registration is issued in a foreign  country to a vehicle
owned by a member of the Armed Forces. The exemption granted by this subsection applies only  for
a period of 45 days from the time the vehicle is returned to the United States.
(4) A vehicle is exempt from registration if it is not operated on the highways of this state.
(5) A trailer is exempt from registration if it  is equipped with pneumatic tires made of elastic
material and is not operated in this  state with a loaded weight of more than 1,800 pounds. A trailer
for hire, travel trailer or camper is not exempt by this subsection.
(6) Vehicles owned and operated by the United  States Government are exempt from registration.
(7) Snowmobiles are subject to the requirements for registration provided  under ORS 821.080 to
821.110.
(8) Implements of husbandry,  well drilling machinery, emergency fire apparatus providing public
fire protection and wheelchairs are exempt from registration.
(9) Road graders, farm tractors and farm trailers on  highways are exempt from registration
when the operation of the vehicle upon the highway  is incidental to its use in an agricultural op-
eration.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (26) of this section, fixed load vehicles are  exempt from
registration while the vehicles are operated:
(a) In the construction or reconstruction of state or  county roads, highways or city streets; and
(b) Within the immediate construction projects, as described  in the governmental agency con-
tract under which the work is being performed.
(11) Motor vehicles designed to  operate at a loaded weight over 8,000 pounds, trailers and
equipment are exempt from registration while being used for the purposes of forest protection  and
fire suppression under ORS chapter 477 or  a similar federal statute. The exemption under this sub-
section applies to the vehicles or equipment described while being  moved to or from the work area.
The exemption under  this subsection only applies to vehicles or equipment owned, leased, contracted
for or requisitioned  by the State Forester or State Board of Forestry, a contractor of the State
Forester or State Board of Forestry under ORS chapter 477 or the United States Government.
(12) Vehicles being used for the purposes of forest protection and  fire suppression are exempt
if the vehicles are necessary in order to comply with ORS 477.615 or 477.650 or a similar federal
statute. The exemption under this subsection also applies to the  vehicles described being moved to
or from the work area.
(13) Golf cart exemptions from registration are as provided in ORS 820.210.
(14) Vehicles currently registered and titled in any other country, state or territory are not  re-
quired to be registered by this state. All of the following apply to this subsection:
(a) This subsection only provides an exemption as long as the  owner of the vehicle satisfactorily
shows that the owner is not a resident of this state or has been a resident of this  state for less than
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 4
30 days. For the purpose of this paragraph, a person is a resident  of this state if the person meets
the residency requirements described in ORS 803.200.
(b) The exemption under this subsection applies to  vehicles granted exemptions under ORS
802.500, 802.520 or 826.005 unless otherwise provided for under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a vehicle operated over  the highways of this
state for compensation or profit must comply with the registration requirements  under ORS 803.300
in the same manner as vehicles owned by persons in this state. The following vehicles  are not sub-
ject to this paragraph:
(A) Vehicles operated under reciprocal registration exemptions established under ORS 802.500
or 826.005.
(B) Vehicles operated under an exemption established under ORS 802.520.
(C) Vehicles that are  proportionally registered under an agreement established under ORS
826.007 and according to the procedures established under ORS 826.009 and 826.011.
(D) Any vehicle if duly registered and titled under the laws of the state or country of which the
owner is a bona fide resident to the extent that in the foreign country, state, territory  or federal
district where the  owner resides like exemptions and privileges are granted vehicles duly registered
and titled under the laws of this state and owned by residents of this state.
(d) If no exemption from registration requirements is in effect under ORS 802.500, 802.520,
826.005 or 826.007 with respect to another jurisdiction, any  vehicle properly registered and titled in
such other jurisdiction and for which evidence of  compliance is supplied shall receive, when oper-
ated in this  state, the same exemptions, benefits and privileges granted by such other jurisdictions
to vehicles properly registered and titled in this state. Reciprocity extended under this  paragraph
shall apply to commercial vehicles only when engaged exclusively in interstate commerce.
(e) Any vehicle operated under dealer registration plates issued by  another state, country,
province, territory or the District of Columbia is subject to this subsection.
(15) Vehicles operated  or used by vehicle dealers may be operated or used without registration
as provided under ORS 822.040.
(16) Vehicles towed by towing businesses may be  towed without registration as provided under
ORS 822.210.
(17) Vehicles without  registration may be transported by vehicle transporters as provided under
ORS 822.310.
(18) Vehicles that  are not registered may be operated under trip permits described under ORS
803.600 or under permits described under ORS 803.610 to 803.625.
(19) If trailers that are part of a  fleet of trailers for hire are properly registered in this state
under an agreement entered into pursuant to  ORS 802.500, all trailers that are identified as being
a part of the same fleet and that are  currently registered in any state, territory, province, country
or the District of Columbia shall be permitted to operate in  this state in both interstate and intra-
state commerce without being registered by this state.
(20) Vehicles that are registered by the United States Department  of State and that are owned
or operated by foreign nationals with diplomatic immunity are exempt from registration.
(21) Tow dollies and converter dollies are exempt from registration.
(22) Class I, Class III and Class IV all-terrain vehicles are exempt from registration.
(23) Motor assisted scooters are exempt from registration.
(24) Electric personal assistive mobility devices are exempt from registration.
(25) A racing activity vehicle that is being operated for the purposes of a test drive within a
30-mile radius of the location where the vehicle is manufactured is exempt from registration.
(26) Road machinery that is operated at the direction of a road  authority is exempt from regis-
tration. The exemption under this subsection also applies when the  operation of road machinery
upon a highway or an alley is incidental to its use in a highway maintenance operation.
(27) Powered micromobility devices are exempt from registration.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 806.020 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 5
806.020. This section provides exemptions from the necessity for compliance  with or proof of
compliance with financial responsibility requirements in accident reports under ORS  811.725, when
applying for vehicle registration  under ORS 803.370 or 803.460 and for operating a vehicle under
ORS 806.010. The owner or operator of a vehicle is exempt, as provided by this section, from fi-
nancial responsibility requirements if the vehicle involved  in the accident, sought to be registered
or operated is any of the following:
(1) An antique vehicle issued permanent registration under ORS 805.010.
(2) A farm trailer.
(3) A farm tractor.
(4) An implement of husbandry.
(5) A vehicle of special interest that is maintained as a collector’s item  and used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses, but not used  primarily for the transportation of persons
or property.
(6) A snowmobile or a Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle, unless  the vehicle is
operating on an all-terrain vehicle highway access route that  is designated by the Oregon Trans-
portation Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(7) Any motor  vehicle not operated on any highway or premises open to the public in this state.
(8) A motor assisted scooter.
(9) An electric personal assistive mobility device.
(10) A powered micromobility device.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 807.020 is amended to read:
807.020. A person who  is granted a driving privilege by this section may exercise the driving
privilege described without violation of the requirements under ORS 807.010. A grant of  driving
privileges to operate a motor vehicle under this section is subject to  suspension and revocation the
same as other driving privileges granted under the vehicle code. This section is in  addition to any
exemptions from the vehicle code  under ORS 801.026. The following persons are granted the de-
scribed driving privileges:
(1) A person who is not a resident of  this state or who has been a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver  permit if the person
holds a current out-of-state license  issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a per-
son is a resident of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS
807.062. To qualify under this  subsection, the person must have the out-of-state license or driver
permit in the person’s possession. A person is not granted driving privileges under this subsection:
(a) If the person is under the minimum age required to be eligible for driving  privileges under
ORS 807.060;
(b) During a period of suspension or revocation by this state or any other jurisdiction  of driving
privileges or of the right to apply for a license or driver  permit issued by this state or any other
jurisdiction;  or
(c) That exceed the driving privileges  granted to the person by the out-of-state license or driver
permit.
(2) A person who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States  or a member of the
commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric  Administration may operate a motor
vehicle without an Oregon license  or driver permit if the person is operating a motor vehicle in the
course of the person’s duties in  the Armed Forces or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration.
(3) A person without a  license or driver permit may operate a road roller or road machinery
that is not required to be registered under the laws of this state.
(4) A person without a license or driver permit may temporarily  operate, draw, move or propel
a farm tractor or implement of husbandry.
(5) A person  without a license or driver permit may operate a motor vehicle to demonstrate
driving ability during the course  of an examination administered under ORS 807.070 for the purpose
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 6
of qualifying for a license or driver  permit. This subsection only applies when an authorized exam-
iner is in a seat beside the driver of the motor vehicle.
(6) Driving privileges for snowmobiles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.150.
(7) Driving privileges for  Class I all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.170,
unless a  person is operating a Class I all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway access
route that is designated by the Oregon Transportation Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(8) Driving  privileges for Class III all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS
821.172, unless a person  is operating a Class III all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway
access route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(9) Driving privileges for Class IV all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in  ORS
821.176, unless a person  is operating a Class IV all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway
access route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(10) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a golf cart  in accordance with an
ordinance adopted under ORS 810.070.
(11) The  spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty or the
spouse of a member  of the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Adminis-
tration who is accompanying the member on assignment in this state may operate a motor vehicle
if the spouse has a current  out-of-state license or driver permit issued to the spouse by another state
in the spouse’s possession.
(12) A person who is a member of  the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty or a
member of the commissioned corps  of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration may
operate a motor vehicle if the person has a current  out-of-state license or driver permit in the
person’s possession that is issued to the person by the person’s state of  domicile or by the Armed
Forces of the United States in a foreign country. Driving privileges  described under this subsection
that are granted by the Armed Forces apply only for a period of  45 days from the time the person
returns to the United States.
(13) A person who does not hold a motorcycle endorsement may operate  a motorcycle if the
person is:
(a) Within an enclosed cab;
(b) Operating a vehicle designed to travel with three  wheels in contact with the ground at
speeds of less than 15 miles per hour; or
(c) Operating an autocycle.
(14) Except as provided in subsection (15) of this section, a person may operate a bicycle without
any grant of driving privileges.
[(15) A person may operate the following without any grant of driving  privileges if the person is
16 years of age or older: ]
[(a) A Class 1 electric assisted bicycle; ]
[(b) A Class 2 electric assisted bicycle; or ]
[(c) A Class 3 electric assisted bicycle. ]
(15) A person may operate a Class 1 electric assisted bicycle or a Class 2  electric assisted
bicycle without any grant of driving privileges if  the person is participating in a bicycle
safety program as described in ORS 802.325. Otherwise, a person may  operate the following
without any grant of driving privilege if the person is operating:
(a) A Class 1 electric assisted bicycle and is 14 years of age or older;
(b) A Class 2 electric assisted bicycle and is 16 years of age or older; or
(c) A Class 3 electric assisted bicycle and is 16 years of age or older.
(16) A person may operate a motor assisted scooter without [ a driver license or  driver permit ]
any grant of driving privileges  if the person is [ 16] 14 years of age or older.
(17) A person who is not a resident of this state or who has  been a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver  permit if the person
is at least 15 years of age and  has in the person’s possession a current out-of-state equivalent of a
Class C instruction driver permit issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a  person
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 7
is a  resident of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS 807.062.
A person operating a motor vehicle  under authority of this subsection has the same privileges and
is subject to the  same restrictions as a person operating under the authority of a Class C instruction
driver permit issued as provided in ORS 807.280.
(18) A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device without any grant  of
driving privileges if the person is [ 16] 14 years of age or older.
(19) A person may operate a powered micromobility device without any grant of  driving
privileges if the person is 16 years of age or older.
(20) A person may operate a motorized wheelchair without any  grant of driving privi-
leges.
SECTION 9.  ORS 811.050 is amended to read:
811.050. (1) A person commits the offense of failure of a  motor vehicle operator to yield to a
rider on a bicycle lane if the person is operating a motor vehicle and the person  does not yield the
right of  way to a person operating a bicycle, electric assisted bicycle, electric personal assistive
mobility device, moped,  motor assisted scooter , powered micromobility device  or motorized
wheelchair upon a bicycle lane.
(2) This section does not require a person operating a moped to yield  the right of way to a bi-
cycle or a motor assisted scooter if the moped is  operated on a bicycle lane in the manner permitted
under ORS 811.440.
(3) The offense described in this section, failure of  a motor vehicle operator to yield to a rider
on a bicycle lane, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 10.  ORS 811.440 is amended to read:
811.440. This section provides exemptions from the prohibitions under  ORS 811.435 and 814.210
against operating motor vehicles on bicycle lanes and paths. The following vehicles are not subject
to ORS 811.435 and 814.210 under the circumstances described:
(1) A person may operate a  moped on a bicycle lane that is immediately adjacent to the roadway
only while the moped is being exclusively powered by human power.
(2) A person may operate a motor vehicle upon a bicycle lane when:
(a) Making a turn;
(b) Entering or leaving an alley, private road or driveway; or
(c) Required in the course of official duty.
(3) An implement of  husbandry may momentarily cross into a bicycle lane to permit other ve-
hicles to overtake and pass the implement of husbandry.
(4) A person may operate a motorized wheelchair on a bicycle lane or path.
(5) A person may operate a motor assisted scooter on a bicycle lane or path.
(6) A person may operate an electric personal  assistive mobility device on a bicycle lane or
path.
(7) A person may operate a powered micromobility device on a bicycle lane or path.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 801.348 is amended to read:
801.348. “Motor assisted scooter” means a vehicle that:
(1) Is designed to be operated on the ground with not more than four wheels;
(2) Has a foot support or seat for the operator’s use;
(3) Can be propelled by motor or human propulsion; and
(4) Is equipped with  a power source that is incapable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of
greater than [ 24] 20 miles per hour on level ground and:
(a) If the  power source is a combustion engine, has a piston or rotor displacement of 35 cubic
centimeters or less regardless of the number of chambers in the power source; or
(b) If the power source is electric, has a power output of not more than 1,000 watts.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 814.512 is amended to read:
814.512. (1) A person operating a motor assisted scooter commits the offense of  unlawful opera-
tion of a motor assisted scooter if:
(a) The person is under [ 16] 14 years of age; or
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 8
(b) The person operates a  motor assisted scooter at a rate of speed exceeding [ 15] 20 miles per
hour.
(2) The offense described in this section, unlawful operation of a motor  assisted scooter, is a
Class D traffic violation.
PROTECTIVE HEADGEAR REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 13.  ORS 814.486 is amended to read:
814.486. (1) A person commits the offense of endangering a [ bicycle] vehicle  operator or pas-
senger if:
(a) The person is operating  or using  a [ bicycle] vehicle on a highway or on premises open to
the public and the person  carries another person on the [ bicycle] vehicle who is under 16 years of
age and is not wearing protective headgear of a type approved under ORS 815.052; or
(b) The person is the parent, legal  guardian or person with legal responsibility for the safety
and welfare of a child under 16 years of age  and the child operates , uses  or rides on a [ bicycle]
vehicle on a highway or on premises open to the public without wearing protective headgear of a
type approved under ORS 815.052.
[(2) Exemptions from this section are as provided in ORS 814.487. ]
(2) This section applies to the following vehicles:
(a) Bicycles;
(b) Motor assisted scooters;
(c) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(d) Powered micromobility devices; or
(e) Skateboards, nonmotorized scooters or in-line skates.
(3) The requirement to wear protective headgear  under this section does not apply if
wearing the headgear would violate a religious belief or practice of the person.
[(3)] (4)  The offense described in this section, endangering a [ bicycle] vehicle operator or pas-
senger, is a specific fine traffic violation. The presumptive  fine for endangering a [ bicycle] vehicle
operator or passenger is $25.
(5) The first time a person is  convicted of an offense described in this section the person
is not required to pay a fine  if the person proves to the satisfaction of the court that the
person has protective headgear of a type approved under ORS 815.052.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 814.489 is amended to read:
814.489. (1) Evidence of violation of ORS [ 814.485 or] 814.486 and evidence  of lack of protective
headgear [ shall] is  not [ be] admissible, applicable or effective to reduce  the amount of damages or
to constitute a defense to an action for damages  brought by or on behalf of an injured [ bicyclist or
bicycle passenger ] operator, user or passenger  of a vehicle  or the survivors of a deceased
[bicyclist or  passenger ] operator, user or passenger of a vehicle  if the [ bicyclist or passenger ] op-
erator, user or passenger of a vehicle  was  injured or killed as a result in whole or in part of the
fault of another.
(2) For purposes of this section, “vehicle” means the  vehicles specified in ORS 814.486 (2).
SECTION 15.  ORS 815.052 is amended to read:
815.052. (1) The Department of Transportation shall adopt and  enforce rules establishing mini-
mum standards and specifications for safe  protective headgear to be worn by people operating , us-
ing, being carried on or  riding  [ bicycles, by passengers on bicycles and by people riding on
skateboards or scooters or using in-line skates ] vehicles.
(2) This section applies to the following vehicles:
(a) Bicycles;
(b) Motor assisted scooters;
(c) Electric personal assistive mobility devices;
(d) Powered micromobility devices; or
(e) Skateboards, nonmotorized scooters or in-line skates.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 9
(3) The rules  shall conform, insofar as practicable, to national safety standards and specifica-
tions for such headgear.
SECTION 16.  ORS 815.281 is amended to read:
815.281. (1) A person commits the offense of selling  noncomplying [ bicycle] protective equipment
if the person sells or offers for sale any [ bicycle] protective  headgear that  does not meet the
standards established by the Department of Transportation under ORS 815.052.
(2) A person commits the offense of unlawfully renting or leasing a [ bicycle] vehicle to another
if the person:
(a) Is in the business of renting or leasing [ bicycles] vehicles; and
(b) Does not have [ bicycle] protective headgear approved under ORS 815.052 available for rental
for use by persons under 16 years of age.
(3) The offenses described in this section are Class D traffic violations.
SECTION 17.
ORS 814.485, 814.487, 814.488, 814.534 and 814.600 are repealed.
PENALTIES
SECTION 18. Sections 19 and 20 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of  the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 19. (1) As used in this section, “storage battery” means:
(a) A rechargeable battery that supplies electrical  power to the motor that propels a
vehicle and includes a replacement original equipment traction battery;
(b) A battery sold as part of a kit  intended to convert a bicycle into an electric assisted
bicycle or a nonmotorized vehicle into a motor assisted scooter,  electric personal assistive
mobility device or powered micromobility device; or
(c) A  battery advertised as suitable for use with an electric assisted bicycle, motor as-
sisted scooter, electric personal assistive mobility device or powered micromobility device.
(2) A person commits the offense of improper sale or lease of a vehicle if the person:
(a) Sells, leases or offers for sale or lease a storage  battery or charging system either
as part of or intended for use in a vehicle and the storage  battery or charging system has
not been certified by an accredited testing laboratory as recognized by  the United States
Occupational Safety and Health Administration, the United States Consumer Product  Safety
Commission or an independent laboratory that  has been certified by an accrediting body for
compliance with nationally recognized battery standards or other standards deemed  suffi-
cient by the Department of Transportation; or
(b) Sells, leases  or offers for sale or lease a vehicle or a storage battery or charging
system for a vehicle, unless a clear, legible indicia of the  accredited testing laboratory de-
scribed in  paragraph (a) of this subsection is permanently affixed on the vehicle or the
storage battery or charging system for the vehicle.
(3) The offense  described in this section does not apply if the vehicle or storage battery
or charging system is being sold as used.
(4) The offense  described in this section, improper sale or lease of a vehicle, applies to
the following vehicles only:
(a) Electric assisted bicycles;
(b) Motor assisted scooters;
(c) Electric personal assistive mobility devices; or
(d) Powered micromobility devices.
(5) The offense described in this section, improper sale or lease of a vehicle, is a Class
D traffic violation.
SECTION 20.
(1) A person commits the offense of selling an impostor vehicle if:
(a) The person advertises, sells or offers for sale a vehicle:
(A) As an electric assisted bicycle and  the vehicle does not fit the definition of an electric
assisted bicycle as defined in ORS 801.258;
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 10
(B) As a  motor assisted scooter and the vehicle does not fit the definition of a motor
assisted scooter as defined in ORS 801.348; or
(C) As a powered micromobility device and the vehicle  does not fit the definition of a
powered micromobility device as defined in section 2 of this 2026 Act; or
(b) The  vehicle is designed, manufactured or intended by the manufacturer or seller to
be configured or modified to not meet the requirements or operate within:
(A) The requirements for the type  of vehicle it is being sold, leased or offered for sale
as; or
(B) If an electric assisted bicycle, the  class of electric assisted bicycle it is being sold,
leased, or offered for sale as.
(2) The offense of selling an impostor vehicle is a Class D traffic violation.
(3) In addition to any other penalty, a person that violates this  section commits in an
unlawful practice under ORS 646.608.
(4) For purposes of this section, “configured or modified” includes  any of the following
changes:
(a) A mechanical switch or button;
(b) A modification or change to the electric motor or the electric drive system;
(c) The use of an application to increase or override the electric drive system; or
(d) Any other means represented or intended  by the manufacturer or seller to modify the
electric assisted bicycle,  motor assisted scooter or powered micromobility device to no longer
meet the requirements or classification of the vehicle.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 646.608 is amended to read:
646.608. (1) A person engages in an unlawful practice if in the course of  the person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person does any of the following:
(a) Passes off real estate, goods or services as the real estate, goods or services of another.
(b) Causes likelihood of  confusion or of misunderstanding as to the source, sponsorship, ap-
proval, or certification of real estate, goods or services.
(c) Causes likelihood of  confusion or of misunderstanding as to affiliation, connection, or asso-
ciation with, or certification by, another.
(d) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic  origin in connection with real
estate, goods or services.
(e) Represents that real  estate, goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics,
ingredients, uses, benefits, quantities  or qualities that the real estate, goods or services do not have
or that a  person has a sponsorship, approval, status, qualification, affiliation, or connection that the
person does not have.
(f) Represents that real estate or goods are original or new if the real estate or goods  are de-
teriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand.
(g) Represents that real  estate, goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade,
or that real estate or goods are of a  particular style or model, if the real estate, goods or services
are of another.
(h) Disparages the real estate, goods, services, property or business of a  customer or another
by false or misleading representations of fact.
(i) Advertises real estate, goods or services with intent not to provide the real estate, goods or
services as advertised,  or with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the
advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity.
(j) Makes false or misleading representations  of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of,
or amounts of price reductions.
(k) Makes false or misleading representations concerning credit availability or the nature of  the
transaction or obligation incurred.
(L) Makes false or misleading representations  relating to commissions or other compensation to
be paid in exchange for permitting real estate, goods or  services to be used for model or demon-
stration purposes or in exchange for submitting names of potential customers.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 11
(m) Performs service  on or dismantles any goods or real estate if the owner or apparent owner
of the goods or real estate does not authorize the service or dismantling.
(n) Solicits potential customers by telephone or door to door as a  seller unless the person pro-
vides the information required under ORS 646.611.
(o) In a sale, rental or other disposition of real estate, goods  or services, gives or offers to give
a rebate or discount  or otherwise pays or offers to pay value to the customer in consideration of
the customer giving to the person the names of prospective purchasers, lessees,  or borrowers, or
otherwise aiding the person in making a sale, lease, or loan  to another person, if earning the rebate,
discount or other  value is contingent upon an event occurring after the time the customer enters
into the transaction.
(p) Makes any false or misleading statement about a prize, contest or promotion  used to publi-
cize a product, business or service.
(q) Promises to deliver real estate, goods  or services within a certain period of time with intent
not to deliver the real estate, goods or services as promised.
(r) Organizes or induces or attempts to induce membership in a pyramid club.
(s) Makes false or misleading representations of fact concerning the offering  price of, or the
person’s cost for real estate, goods or services.
(t) Concurrent with tender or delivery of any real estate, goods or services, fails to disclose any
known material defect or material nonconformity.
(u) Engages in any other unfair or deceptive conduct in trade or commerce.
(v) Violates any of the provisions relating to  auction sales, consignment sales, auctioneers,
consignees or auction marts under ORS 698.640,  whether in a commercial or noncommercial situ-
ation.
(w) Manufactures mercury fever thermometers.
(x) Sells or supplies mercury fever  thermometers unless the thermometer is required by federal
law, or is:
(A) Prescribed by a person licensed under ORS chapter 677; and
(B) Supplied with instructions on the careful handling  of the thermometer to avoid breakage and
on the proper cleanup of mercury should breakage occur.
(y) Sells a thermostat that contains mercury, unless the thermostat is labeled  in a manner to
inform the purchaser that mercury is present in the thermostat  and that the thermostat may not be
disposed of until the mercury is removed, reused, recycled  or otherwise managed to ensure that the
mercury does not become part of the solid waste stream or wastewater. For purposes of  this para-
graph, “thermostat” means a device commonly used to sense and,  through electrical communication
with heating, cooling or ventilation equipment, control room temperature.
(z) Sells or offers for sale a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006, that contains
mercury light switches.
(aa) Violates the provisions of ORS 803.375, 803.385 or 815.410 to 815.430.
(bb) Violates ORS 646A.070 (1).
(cc) Violates any requirement of ORS 646A.030 to 646A.040.
(dd) Violates the provisions of ORS 128.801 to 128.898.
(ee) Violates ORS 646.883 or 646.885.
(ff) Violates ORS 646.569 or 646A.374.
(gg) Violates the provisions of ORS 646A.142.
(hh) Violates ORS 646A.360.
(ii) Violates ORS 646.553 or 646.557 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(jj) Violates ORS 646.563.
(kk) Violates ORS 759.680 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(LL) Violates the  provisions of ORS 759.705, 759.710 and 759.720 or any rule adopted pursuant
thereto.
(mm) Violates ORS 646A.210 or 646A.214.
(nn) Violates any provision of ORS 646A.124 to 646A.134.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 12
(oo) Violates ORS 646A.095.
(pp) Violates ORS 822.046.
(qq) Violates ORS 128.001.
(rr) Violates ORS 646A.800 (2) to (4).
(ss) Violates ORS 646A.090.
(tt) Violates ORS 87.686.
(uu) Violates ORS 646A.803.
(vv) Violates ORS 646A.362.
(ww) Violates ORS 646A.052 or any rule adopted under ORS 646A.052 or 646A.054.
(xx) Violates ORS 180.440 (1) or 180.486 (1).
(yy) Commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer without a certificate under ORS 822.005.
(zz) Violates ORS 87.007 (2) or (3).
(aaa) Violates ORS 92.405 (1), (2) or (3).
(bbb) Engages in an unlawful practice under ORS 646.648.
(ccc) Violates ORS 646A.365.
(ddd) Violates ORS 98.853, 98.854, 98.856 or 98.858.
(eee) Sells a gift card in violation of ORS 646A.276.
(fff) Violates ORS 646A.102, 646A.106 or 646A.108.
(ggg) Violates ORS 646A.430 to 646A.450.
(hhh) Violates a provision of ORS 744.318 to 744.384.
(iii) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.702 to 646A.720.
(jjj) Violates ORS 646A.530 30 or more days after a recall notice, warning  or declaration de-
scribed in ORS 646A.530 is issued for the children’s product, as defined in ORS 646A.525, that is  the
subject of the violation.
(kkk) Violates a provision of ORS 697.612, 697.642, 697.652, 697.662, 697.682, 697.692 or 697.707.
(LLL) Violates the consumer protection provisions of the Servicemembers Civil  Relief Act, 50
U.S.C. 3901 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2010.
(mmm) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495.
(nnn) Violates ORS 646A.082.
(ooo) Violates ORS 646.647.
(ppp) Violates ORS 646A.115.
(qqq) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.405.
(rrr) Violates ORS 646A.092.
(sss) Violates a provision of ORS 646.644.
(ttt) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.295.
(uuu) Engages in the business of, or acts  in the capacity of, an immigration consultant, as de-
fined in  ORS 9.280, in this state and for compensation, unless federal law authorizes the person to
do so or unless the person is an active licensee of the Oregon State Bar.
(vvv) Violates ORS 702.012, 702.029 or 702.054.
(www) Violates ORS 646A.806.
(xxx) Violates ORS 646A.810 (2).
(yyy) Violates ORS 443.376.
(zzz) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.770 to 646A.787.
(aaaa) Violates ORS 815.077.
(bbbb) Violates a provision of ORS 83.710 to 83.750.
(cccc) Violates ORS 646A.087.
(dddd) Violates ORS 646A.815.
(eeee) Violates ORS 646A.677 (11)(a) or (12).
(ffff) Violates section 20 of this 2026 Act.
(2) A representation under subsection (1) of this section  or ORS 646.607 may be any manifesta-
tion of any assertion by words or conduct, including, but not limited to, a failure  to disclose a fact.
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 13
(3) In order to prevail in an action or suit under ORS 336.184 and 646.605  to 646.652, a prose-
cuting attorney need not prove competition between the parties or actual  confusion or misunder-
standing.
(4) An action or  suit may not be brought under subsection (1)(u) of this section unless the At-
torney General has first established a rule in accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter  183
declaring the conduct to be unfair or deceptive in trade or commerce.
(5) Notwithstanding  any other provision of ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652, if an action or
suit is brought under subsection (1)(xx) of this section by a person other than a prosecuting attor-
ney, relief is limited to an injunction, and  the prevailing party may be awarded reasonable attorney
fees.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 22.
 ORS 153.633 is amended to read:
153.633. (1) In any criminal action in a circuit court in which a fine is imposed, the  lesser of the
following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $65; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $65.
(2) In any criminal action  in a justice or municipal court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser
of the following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $50; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $50.
(3) A justice or municipal court shall forward the amount prescribed under  subsection (2) of this
section to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account.
(4)(a) The provisions of this section do not apply to fines imposed under ORS 339.990.
(b) The provisions of subsection (2) of  this section do not apply to fines imposed in justice and
municipal courts under ORS 811.590, [ 814.485,] 814.486, [ 814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990 (1).
SECTION 23.
 ORS 153.645 is amended to read:
153.645. (1) If a justice court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and  the con-
viction resulted from a prosecution arising out of  an arrest or complaint made by an officer of the
Oregon State Police or by any other enforcement officer employed  by state government, as defined
in ORS 174.111:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4)  of this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the county in which the justice  court is
located; and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the state.
(2) If a justice court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the conviction
resulted from a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by a sheriff,  deputy sheriff
or any other enforcement officer employed by the county:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account; and
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the remaining amount  of the fine is payable to the
county in which the court is located.
(3) If a justice court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the conviction
resulted from  a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by an enforcement officer
employed by any other local government, as defined in ORS 174.116:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 14
(b) Subject to subsection (4)  of this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection  is payable to the local government that employs the
enforcement officer; and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the county in which the court is located.
(4) If the full amount of the fine  imposed by a justice court is collected, the last $16 of the
amount collected shall be paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the court is  located
and may be used only for the purposes specified in ORS 153.660. If the full  amount of the fine im-
posed is  not collected, the $16 payment required by this subsection shall be reduced by one dollar
for every dollar of the fine that is not collected. The provisions of this subsection do not  apply to
fines imposed for violations of ORS 811.590,  [814.485,] 814.486, [814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990
(1).
SECTION 24.  ORS 153.650 is amended to read:
153.650. (1) If a municipal court enters a judgment of conviction  for a traffic offense and the
conviction resulted from a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by an  officer of
the Oregon State Police or by any other enforcement officer employed by state government,  as de-
fined in ORS 174.111:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4)  of this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the city in which the municipal court is
located;  and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the state.
(2) If a municipal  court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense and the conviction
resulted from a prosecution arising out  of an arrest or complaint made by a city police officer or
any other enforcement officer employed by the city:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account; and
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the remaining amount  of the fine is payable to the
city in which the court is located.
(3) If a municipal court enters a judgment of conviction for a traffic offense  and the conviction
resulted from  a prosecution arising out of an arrest or complaint made by an enforcement officer
employed by any other local government, as defined in ORS 174.116:
(a) The amount prescribed by ORS 153.633 (2) is payable to the state and must be forwarded to
the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account;
(b) Subject to subsection (4)  of this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection  is payable to the local government that employs the
enforcement officer; and
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, one-half of the amount remaining after any payment
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection is payable to the city in which the court is located.
(4) If the full amount of the fine imposed by a municipal court is collected, the last $16 of the
amount collected shall be paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the court is  located
and may be used only for the purposes specified in ORS 153.660. If the full  amount of the fine im-
posed is  not collected, the $16 payment required by this subsection shall be reduced by one dollar
for every dollar of the fine that is not collected. The provisions of this subsection do not  apply to
fines imposed for violations of ORS 811.590,  [814.485,] 814.486, [814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990
(1).
SECTION 25.
 ORS 153.660 is amended to read:
153.660. (1) If a justice or municipal  court imposes a fine for any offense other than a traffic
offense and the full amount of the fine imposed is  collected, the last $16 of the amount collected
shall be  paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the court is located and may be used
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 15
only for the purposes specified in this section. If the full amount  of the fine imposed is not collected,
the $16 payment  required by this subsection shall be reduced by one dollar for every dollar of the
fine that  is not collected. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to fines imposed for vio-
lations of ORS 811.590, [ 814.485,] 814.486, [ 814.534,] 814.536[, 814.600] or 830.990 (1).
(2) Sixty percent of the amounts paid  to the county treasurer under this section and under ORS
153.645 (4)  and 153.650 (4) shall be deposited by the treasurer in the county treasury and may be
used only for drug and alcohol programs  and for the costs of planning, operating and maintaining
county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities.
(3) Forty percent of the amounts paid to the county treasurer under this section and under ORS
153.645 (4) and 153.650 (4) shall be deposited by the treasurer in  the court facilities security account
established under ORS 1.179 for the county in which the court is located.
SECTION 26.  ORS 814.484 is amended to read:
814.484. (1)  For purposes of ORS [ 814.485,] 814.486, 815.052 and 815.281, “bicycle” has the
meaning given in ORS 801.150 except that:
(a) It also includes  vehicles that meet the criteria specified in ORS 801.150 (1) to (4) but that
have wheels that are 14 inches or less in diameter.
(b) It does not include tricycles designed to be ridden by children.
(2) For  purposes of the offenses defined in ORS [ 814.485,] 814.486 and 815.281 (2), a person [ shall
not be ] is not  considered to be operating or riding on  a bicycle on a highway or on premises open
to the  public if the person is operating or riding on a three-wheeled nonmotorized vehicle on a beach
while it is closed to motor vehicle traffic.
MILK TRUCKS
SECTION 27.
Section 28 of  this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code.
SECTION 28. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a five-year  pilot pro-
gram designed to test the allowance of  commercial motor vehicles weighing not more than
129,000 pounds that transport fluid milk products on a limited  number of highways in this
state. The department shall adopt rules specifying  pilot program routes on highways in this
state where the  department may issue permits for increased motor vehicle weights. In se-
lecting the routes, the department shall prioritize routes that utilize Interstate Highway  84
and:
(a) Connect to bordering states; and
(b) Connect to farms, milk plants, receiving stations or transfer stations for fluid milk
products.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 818.010 and 818.020 and in addition to the exemptions  allowed
under ORS 801.026 and 818.030, under the  pilot program the department shall issue permits
that allow commercial motor vehicles hauling fluid milk products with  a loaded weight of not
more than 129,000 pounds to operate on routes approved by the department.
(3) The department  shall specify the conditions and terms of a permit issued under this
section.
(4) Applications for a permit under  this section shall be made in a form and manner
prescribed by the department.
(5) The department, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the  limita-
tions of a permit issued under this section, may suspend or revoke the permit.
(6) The department shall periodically report back to the  Oregon Transportation Com-
mission on the results of its monitoring and evaluation of impacts to safety, bridges  and
pavement on all the designated routes within the pilot program.
(7) No later  than September 15, 2032, the department shall prepare and submit a report
to the Joint Committee on Transportation and the commission on pilot program results. The
report must include:
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 16
(a) A comprehensive assessment on  increasing maximum weight limitations under the
Oregon Vehicle Code;
(b) An infrastructure impact assessment  detailing the effects of heavier vehicle weight
loads on bridges, pavement and highway safety, with a focus on high-frequency freight routes
in this state;
(c) An economic impact assessment quantifying the contributions of oversized freight  to
Oregon’s economy, balancing potential  economic gains from increased freight capacity with
the costs of infrastructure maintenance and safety considerations;
(d) An assessment of length as a factor for legal axle weights and  alignment with lengths
allowed by the long combination vehicle freeze in federal law;
(e) An assessment of parking and staging infrastructure in this state for oversized loads;
and
(f) Recommendations  supporting informed evaluation of increasing maximum vehicle
weight limits for divisible and nondivisible loads.
(8) The report described in subsection (7) of this section may include  recommendations
for:
(a) Adjusting permit fees to account for highway maintenance needs;
(b) Identifying designated heavy-load corridors to  minimize infrastructure impacts and
improve highway safety;
(c) Designating corridor connections to neighboring states that currently allow increased
vehicle weight limits for commercial motor vehicles as authorized under federal law;
(d) Updating the state transportation asset management plan;
(e) Changing weigh stations and weigh-in-motion systems;
(f) Adjusting bridge inspection plans and load-rating processes;
(g) Updating weight-mile tax rates and tables; and
(h) Collaborating with local road authorities.
(9) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 29.
Section 28 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2033.
HIGHWAY COST ALLOCATION STUDY METHODOLOGY REVIEW
SECTION 30.  Section 14, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  (1) In consultation with the study review team described  in ORS 366.506, the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services shall undertake a review of  the methodology for the highway
cost allocation study required under ORS 366.506.
(2) The department shall examine all aspects of the methodology for the highway  cost allocation
study, including but not limited to the following:
(a) The revenues and expenditures included in the highway cost allocation study;
(b) How costs are allocated across different classes of vehicles;
(c) What constitutes a class of vehicle;
(d) The data used in the highway cost allocation study;
(e) The level of granularity  to which cost responsibility is calculated for potential rate changes;
and
(f) Whether equity should be analyzed  based on an estimate of the future biennium’s revenue
and expenditures or a retrospective analysis of past actual revenue and expenditures.
(3) The department may provide recommendations for updating the  methodology for the study,
including any  changes in statute needed to improve the outcome of the study and ensure fairness
and proportionate revenue and costs for each class of vehicle.
(4) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation,  to the Joint Committee on Transportation no later than [ June
30, 2026] March 15, 2028 .
SECTION 31.
 Section 15, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session), is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 17
Sec. 15.  Section 14 , chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2025 (special session),  as amended by section
30 of this 2026 Act,  [ of this 2025 special session Act ] is repealed on January 2, [ 2027] 2029.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 32. The unit and section captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law  of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
OPERATIVE AND EFFECTIVE DATES
SECTION 33. Sections 1 to 4, 18 to 20, 27 and 28 of  this 2026 Act, the amendments to ORS
153.633, 153.645, 153.650, 153.660,  646.608, 801.348, 803.030, 803.305, 806.020, 807.020, 811.050,
811.440, 814.484, 814.486, 814.489, 814.512, 815.052 and 815.281 by sections 5 to 16 and 21 to 26
of this 2026 Act and the repeal of ORS 814.485, 814.487, 814.488,  814.534 and 814.600 by section
17 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 34. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4007 (HB 4007-A) Page 18